Utah statutes.
9-4-611.   Eligibility requirements for occupants -- Rights of obligee on default of authority.

(1)  Each authority shall make rules establishing eligibility requirements consistent with the purposes and objectives of this part for admission to and continued occupancy in its projects.

(2)  Nothing contained in this section or in Section 9-4-610 may be construed to limit the power of an authority, with respect to a housing project, to vest in an obligee the right, in case of a default by the authority, to take possession or cause the appointment of a receiver free from all the restrictions imposed by this section or Section 9-4-610.

